Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-3902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-3901 to 44-3908, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Active participation means either (a) attendance at formal meetings of a professional insurance association where a formal business program is presented, (b) service on the board of directors or a formal committee of a professional insurance association and involvement in the activities of such board or committee, or (c) participation in industry, regulatory, or legislative meetings held by or on behalf of a professional insurance association;

(2) Department means the Department of Insurance;

(3) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(4) Licensee means a natural person who is licensed by the department as a resident insurance producer or consultant;

(5) Professional insurance association means a state or national membership organization that offers courses, lectures, seminars, or other instructional programs certified by the director as approved continuing education activities pursuant to section 44-3905, is organized as an association or corporation for the express purpose of promoting the interests of insurance licensees in this state or nationally, and is based on paid membership renewable annually or biennially for a membership fee; and

(6) Two-year period means the period commencing on the date of licensing and ending on the date of expiration of the licensee's first license effective for not less than two years and each succeeding twenty-four-month period.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 242;

Laws 1999, LB 260, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 22;
w
Laws 2018, LB486, § 1.
July 19, 2018